Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 30, O.S.L. 2025
(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1-126), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-126. A. As used in this section:
1. "Bell to bell" means the time between the first bell ringing
at the start of the school day to begin instructional time until the
dismissal bell at the end of the school day to end instructional
time; and
2. "Personal electronic device" means a personal device capable
of connecting to a smart phone, the Internet, or a cellular or Wi-Fi
Req. No. 15079 Page 1

netw ork, or directly connecting to another similar device. Personal
electronic devices include, but are not limited to, smart watches,
smart headphones, laptops, tablets, and smart glasses. Personal
electronic devices shall not include school-issued or school-
approved devices that are specifically limited for use in classroom
instruction.
B. 1. For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year
thereafter, each school district board of education shall adopt a
policy prohibiting students from using cell phones and personal
electronic devices while on the campus of a public school district
from bell to bell. The policy shall include disciplinary procedures
for violations.
2. For the 2026-2027 school year and each school year
thereafter, each school district board of education may adopt a
policy prohibiting students from using cell phones and personal
electronic devices while on the campus of a public school district
from bell to bell.
C. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection B of this section
may provide for exceptions including, but not limited to:
1. Emergency use of cell phones or personal electronic devices
by students during the school day; and
2. Use of cell phones or personal electronic devices by
students who use them to monitor health issues.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
Req. No. 15079 Page 2

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15079 SW 12/18/25


















Req. No. 15079 Page 3